Tennessee, session 114, SB1373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-322, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (k) and redesignating the existing subsection (k) as
subsection (l):
(k) All written examinations administered to applicants for a driver license or
intermediate driver license must be in English only. An applicant shall not use a
translation dictionary, an electronic device, or an interpreter to assist with the
administration of the examination.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1373
000392
- 1 -